Rhode Island statutes. Title 20 Fish and Wildlife
Chapter 9 Cooperation in Federal Projects

20-9-1.
Assent to wildlife restoration projects.

The state of Rhode Island assents to the provisions of the act of Congress entitled “An Act to Provide that the United States Shall Aid the States in Wildlife Restoration Projects, and for Other Purposes”, 16 U.S.C. § 669 et seq., and the director of environmental management is authorized, empowered, and directed to perform those acts that may be necessary to the conduct and establishment of cooperative wildlife restoration projects, as defined in that act of Congress, in compliance with that act and with rules and regulations promulgated by the Secretary of the Interior under that act; and no funds accruing to the state of Rhode Island from license fees or interest from license fee accounts paid by hunters shall be diverted for any other purpose than the administration of the division of fish and wildlife of the department of environmental management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 66, § 1.

20-9-2.
Disbursements for restoration projects.

The state controller is authorized and directed to draw orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of any sums as may be required for the purposes of §

20-9-1

, upon receipt by the controller of proper vouchers duly authenticated and approved by the chief of the division of fish and wildlife and by the director of environmental management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-9-3.
Assent to fish restoration and management projects.

The state of Rhode Island assents to the provisions of the act of Congress, entitled “An Act to Provide that the United States Shall Aid the States in Fish Restoration and Management Projects, and for Other Purposes”, 16 U.S.C. § 777 et seq., and the division of fish and wildlife and/or marine fisheries, with the approval of the director of environmental management, is hereby authorized, empowered, and directed to perform any acts as may be necessary to the conduct and establishment of fish restoration and management projects, as defined in that act of Congress, in compliance with that act and with rules and regulations promulgated by the Secretary of the Interior under that act, and no funds accruing to the state from license fees or interest from license fee accounts paid by fishers shall be diverted for any other purpose than the administration of the division of fish and wildlife and/or marine fisheries of the department of environmental management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 66, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 191, § 5; P.L. 2017, ch. 242, § 5.

20-9-4.
Appropriations for fish restoration projects.

The general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum as it may deem necessary to carry out the provisions of §

20-9-3

, and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw orders upon the general treasurer for the payment of that sum, or so much as may be required from time to time, upon receipt by the controller of properly authenticated vouchers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.

20-9-5.
Power of department preserved.

Nothing in §§

20-9-1

—

20-9-4

, shall be construed to divest the department of environmental management of any power or authority vested in the department.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 197, § 3.